Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2999.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-3-64 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-3 entitled "Registration
of Vehicles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-3-64. Combination plates.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue:
(1) For any motor vehicle eligible for registration as a commercial vehicle having a gross
weight of eight thousand eight hundred pounds (8,800 lbs.) or less, plates designated as
“combination” upon application and proper form furnished by the administrator of the division of
motor vehicles to applicants; provided that, any vehicle eligible for registration as a commercial
vehicle having a gross weight of under eight thousand eight hundred pounds (8,800 lbs.) shall be
eligible for a passenger plate, upon the registrant executing an affidavit with the division of motor
vehicles, declaring under oath that the vehicle is not to be used for any commercial purpose. The
combination plates will allow those vehicles to drive for both commercial and pleasure purposes;
or
(2) For any motor vehicle eligible for registration as a commercial vehicle having a gross
weight over eight thousand eight hundred pounds (8,800 lbs.) up to eleven thousand eight hundred
pounds (11,800 lbs.) plates designated as “combination” upon application, proof of ownership of a
camping trailer, fifth-wheel camper trailer, travel trailer, or truck camper as defined in § 31-1-3,
and proper form furnished by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles to applicants. The
combination plates will allow those vehicles to drive for pleasure purposes only.

(b) The fees for commercial vehicles registering for a combination plate shall be identical
to those established for other commercial vehicles of the same weight. A combination registration
transaction shall be considered a change to a new registration classification and not a plate change
transaction. A combination registration shall be renewable during the month of March each year.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005845
========
LC005845 - Page 2 of 3